Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 42 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agency" means any state or local governmental department, cabinet,
institution, board, commission, office, or any other unit of government; and
(b) "Grant" means money, equipment, material, or services that may be
available to an individual or entity from any agency through an application
process administered by the agency.
(2) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall establish a grant database to serve
as a single, unified entry point for individuals and entities to access and review
grant opportunities that are eligible for application. The database shall:
(a) Include the ability to use keyword searches to discover all available grant
opportunities; and
(b) Provide in the information section of the related grant all information
reported by agencies as required under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The primary goals of the grant database include:
(a) Ensuring state and local grants are easily accessible for individuals and
entities of the Commonwealth; and
(b) Clearly stating requirements for grants to ensure submissions are qualified
for the potential grant.
(4) Beginning December 1, 2026, all agencies shall report quarterly to the Finance
and Administration Cabinet the grant opportunities that are currently available
from their agency. The report shall include:
(a) The title of the grant;
(b) The statute or administrative regulation that authorizes the grant;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 9/11/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 893
(c) The posting date of the grant;
(d) The deadline for applying for the grant;
(e) The eligibility criteria for the grant;
(f) The total funds available, including the maximum and minimum amounts a
grant recipient could receive;
(g) The grantor's contact information; and
(h) Any other information that may assist in the identification and orderly
allocation of grant funds.
(5) Each county and area development district shall display a link to the grant
database prominently on the home page or first page of its website.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 9/11/2025 3:12 PM Jacketed